Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1369.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 11-597.02, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE11-597.02. Autopsy reports; photographs, digital images, x-rays and video recordings;  in camera review; exceptions; procedures; immunity A. Notwithstanding title 39, chapter 1, reports, including toxicology, anthropology, neuropathology and odontology reports, photographs, digital images, x-rays and video recordings of human remains that are created by a medical examiner, alternate medical examiner or their employees or agents during a death investigation that is conducted pursuant to this chapter may not be disclosed by a medical examiner, alternate medical examiner or their employees or agents unless a judge of the superior court grants disclosure of all or part of the materials after reviewing the materials in camera.  The judge of the superior court shall balance the interests under the public records laws of this state to determine whether to order disclosure of all or part of the materials.  A person that seeks disclosure of the materials described in this section may file a petition in the superior court of the county in which the death investigation occurred for an in camera review of the materials. B. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A of this section, the following persons may examine and obtain the materials described in subsection A of this section: 1. The county attorney, attorney general or other law enforcement agency having jurisdiction, as necessary for the performance of their its duties. 2. The surviving spouse, child, parent, legal guardian, grandparent, grandchild or sibling of the decedent or their the person's legal representative or designated agent. The office of the medical examiner shall prioritize a request to examine and obtain the materials described in subsection A of this section that is made pursuant to this paragraph.  A request that is made pursuant to this paragraph is subject to section 39-121.01, subsection E. 3. A personal representative of the decedent's estate or a person designated by the decedent before death. 4. Federal, state or local governmental authorities, including public health officers, as necessary for the performance of their duties. 5. The attending physician or nurse practitioner. 6. A medical or scientific body or university or other educational institution for educational or research purposes, provided that the materials used do not reveal the decedent's identity. 7. An attorney for a defendant or petitioner in any criminal or postconviction proceeding for purposes of assisting representation in that proceeding. C. Nothing in This section shall does not affect the conduct of trials or the discovery process as provided by law or court rule. D. The medical examiner or alternate medical examiner may prescribe procedures for the issuance of materials pursuant to subsection B of this section, including reproduction fees. E. A cause of action may not arise against the county medical examiner, alternate medical examiner or their employees or agents, or the county for lawfully disclosing a death investigation report, including a toxicology, anthropology, neuropathology or ODONTOLOGY report, or photograph, digital image, x-ray or video recording pursuant to this section. END_STATUTE